Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1110
Securities exempt from registration.

Sections 8-1104 to 8-1109 shall not apply to any of the following securities:

(1) Any security, including a revenue obligation, issued or guaranteed by the State of Nebraska, any political subdivision, or any agency or corporate or other instrumentality thereof or any certificate of deposit for any of the foregoing;

(2) Any security issued or guaranteed by Canada, any Canadian province, any political subdivision of any such province, any agency or corporate or other instrumentality of one or more of the foregoing, or any other foreign government with which the United States currently maintains diplomatic relations, if the security is recognized as a valid obligation by the issuer or guarantor;

(3) Any security issued or guaranteed by any federal credit union or any credit union or similar association organized and supervised under the laws of this state;

(4) Any security issued or guaranteed by any railroad, other common carrier, public utility, or holding company which is (a) regulated in respect of its rates and charges by a governmental authority of the United States or any state or municipality or (b) regulated in respect of the issuance or guarantee of the security by a governmental authority of the United States, any state, Canada, or any Canadian province;

(5)(a) Any federal covered security specified in section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933 or by rule adopted under that provision;

(b) Any security listed or approved for listing on another securities market specified by rule and regulation or order under the Securities Act of Nebraska;

(c) Any put or a call option contract, a warrant, or a subscription right on or with respect to securities described in subdivisions (a) or (b) of this subdivision;

(d) Any option or similar derivative security on a security or an index of securities or foreign currencies issued by a clearing agency registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and listed or designated for trading on a national securities exchange, a facility of a national securities exchange, or a facility of a national securities association registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

(e) Any offer or sale of the underlying security in connection with the offer, sale, or exercise of an option or other security that was exempt when the option or other security was written or issued; or

(f) Any option or a derivative security designated by the Securities and Exchange Commission under section 9(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

(6) Any security which meets all of the following conditions:

(a) The issuer is organized under the laws of the United States or a state or has appointed a duly authorized agent in the United States for service of process and has set forth the name and address of such agent in its prospectus;

(b) A class of the issuer's securities is required to be and is registered under section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and has been so registered for the three years immediately preceding the offering date;

(c) Neither the issuer nor a significant subsidiary has had a material default during the last seven years, or during the issuer's existence if such existence is less than seven years, in the payment of (i) principal, interest, dividends, or sinking-fund installments on preferred stock or indebtedness for borrowed money or (ii) rentals under leases with terms of three or more years;

(d) The issuer has had consolidated net income, without taking into account extraordinary items and the cumulative effect of accounting changes, of at least one million dollars in four of its last five fiscal years, including its last fiscal year, and if the offering is of interest-bearing securities the issuer has had for its last fiscal year net income before deduction for income taxes and depreciation of at least one and one-half times the issuer's annual interest expense, taking into account the proposed offering and the intended use of the proceeds. However, if the issuer of the securities is a finance company which has liquid assets of at least one hundred five percent of its liabilities, other than deferred income taxes, deferred investment tax credit, capital stock, and surplus, at the end of its last five fiscal years, the net income requirement before deduction for interest expense shall be one and one-fourth times its annual interest expense. For purposes of this subdivision: (i) Last fiscal year means the most recent year for which audited financial statements are available, if such statements cover a fiscal period ending not more than fifteen months from the commencement of the offering; (ii) finance company means a company engaged primarily in the business of wholesale, retail, installment, mortgage, commercial, industrial, or consumer financing, banking, or factoring; and (iii) liquid assets means (A) cash, (B) receivables payable on demand or not more than twelve months following the close of the company's last fiscal year less applicable reserves and unearned income, and (C) readily marketable securities less applicable reserves and unearned income;

(e) If the offering is of stock or shares other than preferred stock or shares, such securities have voting rights which include (i) the right to have at least as many votes per share and (ii) the right to vote on at least as many general corporate decisions as each of the issuer's outstanding classes of stock or shares, except as otherwise required by law; and

(f) If the offering is of stock or shares other than preferred stock or shares, such securities are owned beneficially or of record on any date within six months prior to the commencement of the offering by at least one thousand two hundred persons, and on such date there are at least seven hundred fifty thousand such shares outstanding with an aggregate market value of at least three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars based on the average bid price for such day. When determining the number of persons who are beneficial owners of the stock or shares of an issuer, for purposes of this subdivision, the issuer or broker-dealer may rely in good faith upon written information furnished by the record owners;

(7) Any security issued or guaranteed as to both principal and interest by an international bank of which the United States is a member; or

(8) Any security issued by any person organized and operated not for private profit but exclusively for religious, educational, benevolent, charitable, fraternal, social, athletic, or reformatory purposes, as a chamber of commerce, or as a trade or professional association.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 10, p. 1785;

Laws 1973, LB 167, § 5;

Laws 1980, LB 912, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 391, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 758, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 216, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 942, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1053, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 335, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 23;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB113, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB76, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB148, § 12.